Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.150

Records and accounts—Reports.

Every person offering franchises for sale shall at all times keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of such and the disposition of the proceeds thereof and shall thereafter at such times as are required by the director make and file in the office of the director a report setting forth the franchises sold by it, the proceeds derived therefrom, and the disposition thereof.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 15.]